Tennessee, session 114, SB0127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-13-127(b)(2), is amended by
adding ", as determined by the comptroller of the treasury," after "completed as soon as
practical after June 30 of each year".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0127
000434
- 1 -